Utah statutes.
78A-6-1002.   Practice and procedure -- Jury trial.
(1)  The county attorney or district attorney, as provided under Sections
17-18-1 and 17-18-1.7, shall prosecute any case brought under this part.
(2)  Proceedings under this part shall be governed by the statutes and rules
governing criminal proceedings in the district court, except the court may,
and on stipulation of the parties, shall, transfer the case to the district
court.
